Ohio, session 136, HB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2929.12, 2929.15, 2929.22, 2929.25, and 2937.011 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2929.12. (A) Unless otherwise required by section 2929.13 or 2929.14 of the Revised Code, a court that imposes a sentence under this chapter upon an offender for a felony has discretion to determine the most effective way to comply with the purposes and principles of sentencing set forth in section 2929.11 of the Revised Code. In exercising that discretion, the court shall consider the factors set forth in divisions (B) and (C) of this section relating to the seriousness of the conduct, the factors provided in divisions (D) and (E) of this section relating to the likelihood of the offender's recidivism, the factors set forth in division (F) of this section pertaining to the offender's service in the armed forces of the United States, and the factors set forth in division (G) of this section relating to Alford pleas and, in addition, may consider any other factors that are relevant to achieving those purposes and principles of sentencing. (B) The sentencing court shall consider all of the following that apply regarding the offender, the offense, or the victim, and any other relevant factors, as indicating that the offender's conduct is more serious than conduct normally constituting the offense: (1) The physical or mental injury suffered by the victim of the offense due to the conduct of the offender was exacerbated because of the physical or mental condition or age of the victim. (2) The victim of the offense suffered serious physical, psychological, or economic harm, including serious physical harm the victim caused to the victim's self, as a result of the offense. (3) The victim died by suicide as a result of the offense. (4) The offender held a public office or position of trust in the community, and the offense related to that office or position. (5) The offender's occupation, elected office, or profession obliged the offender to prevent the offense or bring others committing it to justice. (6) The offender's professional reputation or occupation, elected office, or profession was used to facilitate the offense or is likely to influence the future conduct of others. (7) The offender's relationship with the victim facilitated the offense. (8) The offender committed the offense for hire or as a part of an organized criminal activity. (9) In committing the offense, the offender was motivated by prejudice based on race, ethnic background, gender, sexual orientation, or religion. (10) If the offense is a violation of section 2919.25 or a violation of section 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.13 of the Revised Code involving a person who was a family or household member at the time of the violation, the offender committed the offense in the vicinity of one or more children who are not victims of the offense, and the offender or the victim of the offense is a parent, guardian, custodian, or person in loco parentis of one or more of those children. (11) The offender's immigration status, and whether the offender is unlawfully present in the United States or has a current or previous federal immigration detainer. (C) The sentencing court shall consider all of the following that apply regarding the offender, the offense, or the victim, and any other relevant factors, as indicating that the offender's conduct is less serious than conduct normally constituting the offense: (1) The victim induced or facilitated the offense. (2) In committing the offense, the offender acted under strong provocation. (3) In committing the offense, the offender did not cause or expect to cause physical harm to any person or property. (4) There are substantial grounds to mitigate the offender's conduct, although the grounds are not enough to constitute a defense. (D) The sentencing court shall consider all of the following that apply regarding the offender, and any other relevant factors, as factors indicating that the offender is likely to commit future crimes: (1) At the time of committing the offense, the offender was under release from confinement before trial or sentencing; was under a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code; was under post-release control pursuant to section 2967.28 or any other provision of the Revised Code for an earlier offense or had been unfavorably terminated from post-release control for a prior offense pursuant to division (B) of section 2967.16 or section 2929.141 of the Revised Code; was under transitional control in connection with a prior offense; or had absconded from the offender's approved community placement resulting in the offender's removal from the transitional control program under section 2967.26 of the Revised Code. (2) The offender previously was adjudicated a delinquent child pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code prior to January 1, 2002, or pursuant to Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code, or the offender has a history of criminal convictions. (3) The offender has not been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree after previously being adjudicated a delinquent child pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code prior to January 1, 2002, or pursuant to Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code, or the offender has not responded favorably to sanctions previously imposed for criminal convictions. (4) The offender has demonstrated a pattern of drug or alcohol abuse that is related to the offense, and the offender refuses to acknowledge that the offender has demonstrated that pattern, or the offender refuses treatment for the drug or alcohol abuse. (5) The offender shows no genuine remorse for the offense. (E) The sentencing court shall consider all of the following that apply regarding the offender, and any other relevant factors, as factors indicating that the offender is not likely to commit future crimes: (1) Prior to committing the offense, the offender had not been adjudicated a delinquent child. (2) Prior to committing the offense, the offender had not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a criminal offense. (3) Prior to committing the offense, the offender had led a law-abiding life for a significant number of years. (4) The offense was committed under circumstances not likely to recur. (5) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the offender shows genuine remorse for the offense. (F) The sentencing court shall consider the offender's military service record and whether the offender has an emotional, mental, or physical condition that is traceable to the offender's service in the armed forces of the United States and that was a contributing factor in the offender's commission of the offense or offenses. (G) If the offender enters an Alford plea, the sentencing court shall not consider whether the offender showed genuine remorse for the offense. Sec. 2929.15. (A)(1) If in sentencing an offender for a felony the court is not required to impose a prison term, a mandatory prison term, or a term of life imprisonment upon the offender, the court may directly impose a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code. If the court is sentencing an offender for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, in addition to the mandatory term of local incarceration imposed under that division and the mandatory fine required by division (B)(3) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, the court may impose upon the offender a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions in accordance with sections 2929.16 and 2929.17 of the Revised Code. If the court is sentencing an offender for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, in addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term imposed under that division, the court also may impose upon the offender a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. The duration of all community control sanctions imposed on an offender under this division shall not exceed five years. If the offender absconds or otherwise leaves the jurisdiction of the court in which the offender resides without obtaining permission from the court or the offender's probation officer to leave the jurisdiction of the court, or if the offender is confined in any institution for the commission of any offense while under a community control sanction, the period of the community control sanction ceases to run until the offender is brought before the court for its further action. If the court sentences the offender to one or more nonresidential sanctions under section 2929.17 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose as a condition of the nonresidential sanctions that, during the period of the sanctions, the offender must abide by the law and must not leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. The court may impose any other conditions of release under a community control sanction that the court considers appropriate, including, but not limited to, requiring that the offender not ingest or be injected with a drug of abuse and submit to random drug testing as provided in division (D) of this section to determine whether the offender ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse and requiring that the results of the drug test indicate that the offender did not ingest or was not injected with a drug of abuse. (2)(a) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, the court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of a department of probation in the county that serves the court for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any condition of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. Alternatively, if the offender resides in another county and a county department of probation has been established in that county or that county is served by a multicounty probation department established under section 2301.27 of the Revised Code, the court may request the court of common pleas of that county to receive the offender into the general control and supervision of that county or multicounty department of probation for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any condition of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, subject to the jurisdiction of the trial judge over and with respect to the person of the offender, and to the rules governing that department of probation. If there is no department of probation in the county that serves the court, the court shall place the offender, regardless of the offender's county of residence, under the general control and supervision of the adult parole authority, unless the court has entered into an agreement with the authority as described in division (B) or (C) of section 2301.32 of the Revised Code, or under an entity authorized under division (B) of section 2301.27 of the Revised Code to provide probation and supervisory services to counties for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (b) If the court imposing sentence on an offender sentences the offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and if the offender violates any condition of the sanctions, violates any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, violates any law, or departs the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation or departure directly to the sentencing court, or shall report the violation or departure to the county or multicounty department of probation with general control and supervision over the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section or the officer of that department who supervises the offender, or, if there is no such department with general control and supervision over the offender under that division, to the adult parole authority unless the court has entered into an agreement with the authority as described in division (B) or (C) of section 2301.32 of the Revised Code, or to an entity authorized under division (B) of section 2301.27 of the Revised Code to provide probation and supervisory services to the county. If the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction reports the violation or departure to the county or multicounty department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity providing probation and supervisory services to the county, the department's, authority's, or other entity's officers may treat the offender as if the offender were on probation and in violation of the probation, and shall report the violation of the condition of the sanction, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, the violation of law, or the departure from the state without the required permission to the sentencing court. (3) If an offender who is eligible for community control sanctions under this section admits to having a drug addiction or the court has reason to believe that the offender has a drug addiction, and if the offense for which the offender is being sentenced was related to the addiction, the court may require that the offender be assessed by a properly credentialed professional within a specified period of time and shall require the professional to file a written assessment of the offender with the court. If a court imposes treatment and recovery support services as a community control sanction, the court shall direct the level and type of treatment and recovery support services after consideration of the written assessment, if available at the time of sentencing, and recommendations of the professional and other treatment and recovery support services providers. (4) If an assessment completed pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section indicates that the offender has an addiction to drugs or alcohol, the court may include in any community control sanction imposed for a violation of section 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.36, or 2925.37 of the Revised Code a requirement that the offender participate in alcohol and drug addiction services and recovery supports certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code or offered by a properly credentialed community addiction services provider. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, if the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony are violated or if the offender violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the sentencing court may impose on the violator one or more of the following penalties: (a) A longer time under the same sanction if the total time under the sanctions does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A) of this section; (b) A more restrictive sanction under section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, including but not limited to, a new term in a community-based correctional facility, halfway house, or jail pursuant to division (A)(6) of section 2929.16 of the Revised Code; (c) A prison term on the offender pursuant to section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and division (B)(3) of this section, provided that a prison term imposed under this division is subject to the following limitations and rules, as applicable: (i) If the prison term is imposed for any technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fifth degree, the prison term shall not exceed ninety days, provided that if the remaining period of community control at the time of the violation or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence at that time is less than ninety days, the prison term shall not exceed the length of the remaining period of community control or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence. If the court imposes a prison term as described in this division, division (B)(2)(b) of this section applies. (ii) If the prison term is imposed for any technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fourth degree that is not an offense of violence and is not a sexually oriented offense, the prison term shall not exceed one hundred eighty days, provided that if the remaining period of the community control at the time of the violation or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence at that time is less than one hundred eighty days, the prison term shall not exceed the length of the remaining period of community control or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence. If the court imposes a prison term as described in this division, division (B)(2)(b) of this section applies. (iii) A court is not limited in the number of times it may sentence an offender to a prison term under division (B)(1)(c) of this section for a violation of the conditions of a community control sanction or for a violation of a law or leaving the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. If an offender who is under a community control sanction violates the conditions of the sanction or violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, is sentenced to a prison term for the violation or conduct, is released from the term after serving it, and subsequently violates the conditions of the sanction or violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the court may impose a new prison term sanction on the offender under division (B)(1)(c) of this section for the subsequent violation or conduct. (2)(a) If an offender was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision of section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a community control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall not impose any of the penalties described in division (B)(1) of this section based on the violation. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c)(i) or (ii) of this section for a technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction, one of the following is applicable with respect to the time that the offender spends in prison under the term: (i) Subject to division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, it shall be credited against the offender's community control sanction that was being served at the time of the violation, and the remaining time under that community control sanction shall be reduced by the time that the offender spends in prison under the prison term. By determination of the court, the offender upon release from the prison term either shall continue serving the remaining time under the community control sanction, as reduced under this division, or shall have the community control sanction terminated. (ii) If, at the time a prison term is imposed for a technical violation, the offender was serving a residential community control sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code, the time spent serving the residential community control sanction shall be credited against the offender's reserved prison sentence, and the remaining time under that residential community control sanction and under the reserved prison sentence shall be reduced by the time that the offender spends in prison under the prison term. By determination of the court, the offender upon release from the prison term either shall continue serving the remaining time under the residential community control sanction, as reduced under this division, or shall have the residential community control sanction terminated. (3) The prison term, if any, imposed on a violator pursuant to this division and division (B)(1) of this section shall be within the range of prison terms described in this division and shall not exceed a prison term from the range of terms specified in the notice provided to the offender at the sentencing hearing pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 2929.19 of the Revised Code. The court may reduce the longer period of time that the offender is required to spend under the longer sanction, the more restrictive sanction, or a prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section by the time the offender successfully spent under the sanction that was initially imposed. Except as otherwise specified in this division, the prison term imposed under this division and division (B)(1) of this section shall be within the range of prison terms available as a definite term for the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed. If the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term so imposed under this division shall be within the range of prison terms available as a minimum term for the offense under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (C) If an offender, for a significant period of time, fulfills the conditions of a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code in an exemplary manner, the court may reduce the period of time under the sanction or impose a less restrictive sanction, but the court shall not permit the offender to violate any law or permit the offender to leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (D)(1) If a court under division (A)(1) of this section imposes a condition of release under a community control sanction that requires the offender to submit to random drug testing, the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section may cause the offender to submit to random drug testing performed by a laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract with any of the governmental entities or officers authorized to enter into a contract with that laboratory or entity under section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code. (2) If no laboratory or entity described in division (D)(1) of this section has entered into a contract as specified in that division, the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall cause the offender to submit to random drug testing performed by a reputable public laboratory to determine whether the individual who is the subject of the drug test ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse. (3) A laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract pursuant to section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code shall perform the random drug tests under division (D)(1) of this section in accordance with the applicable standards that are included in the terms of that contract. A public laboratory shall perform the random drug tests under division (D)(2) of this section in accordance with the standards set forth in the policies and procedures established by the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5120.63 of the Revised Code. An offender who is required under division (A)(1) of this section to submit to random drug testing as a condition of release under a community control sanction and whose test results indicate that the offender ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse shall pay the fee for the drug test if the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender requires payment of a fee. A laboratory or entity that performs the random drug testing on an offender under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall transmit the results of the drug test to the appropriate department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (E) A court imposing a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code shall consider the offender's immigration status, including whether the offender is unlawfully present in the United States or has a current or previous federal immigration detainer, when determining the length of the community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions to impose. (F) As used in this section, "technical violation" means a violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fifth degree, or for a felony of the fourth degree that is not an offense of violence and is not a sexually oriented offense, and to which neither of the following applies: (1) The violation consists of a new criminal offense that is a felony or that is a misdemeanor other than a minor misdemeanor, and the violation is committed while under the community control sanction. (2) The violation consists of or includes the offender's articulated or demonstrated refusal to participate in the community control sanction imposed on the offender or any of its conditions, and the refusal demonstrates to the court that the offender has abandoned the objects of the community control sanction or condition. Sec. 2929.22. (A) Unless a mandatory jail term is required to be imposed by division (G) of section 1547.99, division (B) of section 4510.14, division (G) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, or any other provision of the Revised Code a court that imposes a sentence under this chapter upon an offender for a misdemeanor or minor misdemeanor has discretion to determine the most effective way to achieve the purposes and principles of sentencing set forth in section 2929.21 of the Revised Code. Unless a specific sanction is required to be imposed or is precluded from being imposed by the section setting forth an offense or the penalty for an offense or by any provision of sections 2929.23 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code, a court that imposes a sentence upon an offender for a misdemeanor may impose on the offender any sanction or combination of sanctions under sections 2929.24 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code. The court shall not impose a sentence that imposes an unnecessary burden on local government resources. (B)(1) In determining the appropriate sentence for a misdemeanor, the court shall consider all of the following factors: (a) The nature and circumstances of the offense or offenses; (b) Whether the circumstances regarding the offender and the offense or offenses indicate that the offender has a history of persistent criminal activity and that the offender's character and condition reveal a substantial risk that the offender will commit another offense; (c) Whether the circumstances regarding the offender and the offense or offenses indicate that the offender's history, character, and condition reveal a substantial risk that the offender will be a danger to others and that the offender's conduct has been characterized by a pattern of repetitive, compulsive, or aggressive behavior with heedless indifference to the consequences; (d) Whether the victim's youth, age, disability, or other factor made the victim particularly vulnerable to the offense or made the impact of the offense more serious; (e) Whether the offender is likely to commit future crimes in general, in addition to the circumstances described in divisions (B)(1)(b) and (c) of this section; (f) Whether the offender has an emotional, mental, or physical condition that is traceable to the offender's service in the armed forces of the United States and that was a contributing factor in the offender's commission of the offense or offenses; (g) The offender's military service record; (h) The offender's immigration status, and whether the offender is unlawfully present in the United States or has a current or previous federal immigration detainer. (2) In determining the appropriate sentence for a misdemeanor, if the offender enters an Alford plea, the sentencing court shall not consider whether the offender showed genuine remorse for the offense. (3) In determining the appropriate sentence for a misdemeanor, in addition to complying with division (B)(1) of this section, the court may consider any other factors that are relevant to achieving the purposes and principles of sentencing set forth in section 2929.21 of the Revised Code. (C) Before imposing a jail term as a sentence for a misdemeanor, a court shall consider the appropriateness of imposing a community control sanction or a combination of community control sanctions under sections 2929.25, 2929.26, 2929.27, and 2929.28 of the Revised Code. A court may impose the longest jail term authorized under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code only upon offenders who commit the worst forms of the offense or upon offenders whose conduct and response to prior sanctions for prior offenses demonstrate that the imposition of the longest jail term is necessary to deter the offender from committing a future criminal offense. (D)(1) A sentencing court shall consider any relevant oral and written statement made by the victim, the victim's representative, the victim's attorney, if applicable, the defendant, the defense attorney, and the prosecuting authority regarding sentencing for a misdemeanor. This division does not create any rights to notice other than those rights authorized by Chapter 2930. of the Revised Code. (2) At the time of sentencing for a misdemeanor or as soon as possible after sentencing, the court shall notify the victim of the offense of the victim's right to file an application for an award of reparations pursuant to sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2929.25. (A)(1) Except as provided in sections 2929.22 and 2929.23 of the Revised Code or when a jail term is required by law, in sentencing an offender for a misdemeanor, other than a minor misdemeanor, the sentencing court may do either of the following: (a) Directly impose a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized by section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. The court may impose any other conditions of release under a community control sanction that the court considers appropriate. If the court imposes a jail term upon the offender, the court may impose any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions in addition to the jail term. (b) Impose a jail term under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code from the range of jail terms authorized under that section for the offense, suspend all or a portion of the jail term imposed, and place the offender under a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. (2) The duration of all community control sanctions imposed upon an offender and in effect for an offender at any time shall not exceed five years. (3) At sentencing, if a court directly imposes a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) or (B) of this section, the court shall state the duration of the community control sanctions imposed and shall notify the offender that if any of the conditions of the community control sanctions are violated the court may do any of the following: (a) Impose a longer time under the same community control sanction if the total time under all of the offender's community control sanctions does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A)(2) of this section; (b) Impose a more restrictive community control sanction under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, but the court is not required to impose any particular sanction or sanctions; (c) Impose a definite jail term from the range of jail terms authorized for the offense under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (B) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) of this section, the sentencing court retains jurisdiction over the offender and the period of community control for the duration of the period of community control. Upon the motion of either party or on the court's own motion, the court, in the court's sole discretion and as the circumstances warrant, may modify the community control sanctions or conditions of release previously imposed, substitute a community control sanction or condition of release for another community control sanction or condition of release previously imposed, or impose an additional community control sanction or condition of release. (C)(1) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, the court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of the court or of a department of probation in the jurisdiction that serves the court for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any of the conditions of the sanctions imposed. If the offender resides in another jurisdiction and a department of probation has been established to serve the municipal court or county court in that jurisdiction, the sentencing court may request the municipal court or the county court to receive the offender into the general control and supervision of that department of probation for purposes of reporting to the sentencing court a violation of any of the conditions of the sanctions imposed. The sentencing court retains jurisdiction over any offender whom it sentences for the duration of the sanction or sanctions imposed. (2) The sentencing court shall require as a condition of any community control sanction that the offender abide by the law and not leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. In the interests of doing justice, rehabilitating the offender, and ensuring the offender's good behavior, the court may impose additional requirements on the offender. The offender's compliance with the additional requirements also shall be a condition of the community control sanction imposed upon the offender. (D)(1) If the court imposing sentence upon an offender sentences the offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, and if the offender violates any of the conditions of the sanctions, the public or private person or entity that supervises or administers the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation directly to the sentencing court or to the department of probation or probation officer with general control and supervision over the offender. If the public or private person or entity reports the violation to the department of probation or probation officer, the department or officer shall report the violation to the sentencing court. (2) Except as provided in division (D)(3) of this section, if an offender violates any condition of a community control sanction, the sentencing court may impose upon the violator one or more of the following penalties: (a) A longer time under the same community control sanction if the total time under all of the community control sanctions imposed on the violator does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A)(2) of this section; (b) A more restrictive community control sanction; (c) A combination of community control sanctions, including a jail term. (3) If an offender was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision under section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a community control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall not impose any of the penalties described in division (D)(2) of this section based on the violation. (4) If the court imposes a jail term upon a violator pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section, the total time spent in jail for the misdemeanor offense and the violation of a condition of the community control sanction shall not exceed the maximum jail term available for the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed. The court may reduce the longer period of time that the violator is required to spend under the longer sanction or the more restrictive sanction imposed under division (D)(2) of this section by all or part of the time the violator successfully spent under the sanction that was initially imposed. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if an offender, for a significant period of time, fulfills the conditions of a community control sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code in an exemplary manner, the court may reduce the period of time under the community control sanction or impose a less restrictive community control sanction. Fulfilling the conditions of a community control sanction does not relieve the offender of a duty to make restitution under section 2929.28 of the Revised Code. (F) A court imposing a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code shall consider the offender's immigration status, including whether the offender is unlawfully present in the United States or has a current or previous federal immigration detainer, when determining the length of the community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions to impose. Sec. 2937.011. (A) Unless the court orders the defendant detained pursuant to section 2937.222 of the Revised Code or other applicable law, the court shall release the defendant on the least restrictive conditions that, in the discretion of the court, will reasonably assure the defendant's appearance in court, the protection or safety of any person or the community, and that the defendant will not obstruct the criminal justice process. If the court orders financial conditions of release, those financial conditions shall be related to public safety, the defendant's risk of nonappearance in court, the seriousness of the offense, and the previous criminal record of the defendant. (B) Any financial conditions shall be in an amount and type that are least costly to the defendant while also sufficient to reasonably assure the defendant's future appearance in court. (C) Any defendant who is entitled to release may be released upon one or more of the following types of bail in the amount set by the court: (1) An unsecured bail bond; (2) A bail bond secured by the deposit of ten per cent of the amount of the bond in cash. The court shall return ninety per cent of the deposit upon compliance with all conditions of the bond. (3) A surety bond, a bond secured by real estate or securities as allowed by law, or the deposit of cash, at the option of the defendant. (D) The court may impose any of the following conditions of release: (1) The personal recognizance of the defendant; (2) Placing the defendant in the custody of a designated person or organization that agrees to supervise the defendant; (3) Placing restrictions on the travel, association, or place of abode of the defendant during the period of release; (4) Placing the defendant under a house arrest, electronic monitoring, or work release program; (5) Regulating or prohibiting the defendant's contact with the victim; (6) Regulating the defendant's contact with witnesses or others associated with the case upon proof of the likelihood that the defendant will threaten, harass, cause injury, or seek to intimidate those persons; (7) For any defendant charged with an offense that is alcohol or drug related, or where alcohol or drug influence or addiction appears to be a contributing factor in the offense, and who appears based upon an evaluation, prior treatment history, or recent alcohol or drug use, to be in need of treatment, requiring completion of a drug or alcohol assessment and compliance with treatment recommendations; (8) Requiring compliance with alternatives to pretrial detention, including diversion programs, day reporting, or comparable alternatives, to ensure the defendant's appearance at future court proceedings; (9) Any other constitutional condition considered reasonably necessary to reasonably assure the defendant's appearance or public safety. (E) Subject to division (I)(2) of this section, in determining the types, amounts, and conditions of bail, the court shall consider all relevant information, including the following: (1) The nature and circumstances of the crime charged, and specifically whether the defendant used or had access to a weapon; (2) The weight of the evidence against the defendant; (3) The confirmation of the defendant's identity; (4) The defendant's family ties, employment, financial resources, character, mental condition, length of residence in the community, jurisdiction of residence, record of convictions, record of appearance at court proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution; (5) Whether the defendant is on probation, a community control sanction, parole, post-release control, bail, or under a court protection order; (6) The offender's immigration status, and whether the offender is unlawfully present in the United States or has a current or previous federal immigration detainer; (7) The considerations required under Ohio Constitution, Article I, Section 9. (F) Absent good cause, there is a presumption of release on personal recognizance when the defendant appears pursuant to a summons issued by the court. (G) When a judicial officer, either on motion of a party or on the court's own motion, determines that the considerations set forth in divisions (D) and (E) of this section require a modification of the conditions of release, the judicial officer may order additional or different types, amounts, or conditions of bail, or may eliminate or lessen conditions of bail the court determines to be no longer necessary. Unless the parties agree to a modification, the court shall hold a hearing on the modification of bond as promptly as possible. Unless modified by the judicial officer, or if application is made by a surety for discharge from a bond pursuant to section 2937.40 of the Revised Code, conditions of release shall continue until the return of a verdict or the entry of a guilty plea or a no-contest plea and may continue thereafter pending sentence or disposition of the case on review. (H) Information stated in or offered in connection with any order entered pursuant to this section does not need to conform to the rules pertaining to the admissibility of evidence in a court of law. The court shall not receive as substantive evidence in the trial of the case statements or admissions of the defendant made at a bail proceeding or in the course of compliance with a condition of bail. (I)(1) In order to expedite the prompt release of a defendant prior to an initial appearance, each court shall establish a bail bond schedule covering all misdemeanors including traffic offenses, either specifically, by type, by potential penalty, or by some other reasonable method of classification. The court also may include requirements for release in consideration of divisions (D) and (E)(5) of this section. The sole purpose of a bail schedule is to allow for the consideration of release prior to the defendant's initial appearance. (2) A bond schedule is not relevant information under division (E) of this section. (3) Each municipal or county court shall, by rule, establish a method whereby a defendant may make bail by use of a credit card. (4) Each court shall review its bail bond schedule biennially by the thirty-first day of January of each even-numbered year beginning in 2024, to ensure an appropriate bail bond schedule that does not result in the unnecessary detention of a defendant due to the defendant's inability to pay. (J)(1) A person who has been arrested, either pursuant to a warrant or without a warrant, and who has not been released on bail, shall be brought before a judicial officer for an initial bail hearing not later than the second court day following the person's arrest. That bail hearing may be combined with the initial appearance provided for in the Rules of Criminal Procedure. (2) If, at the initial bail hearing before a judicial officer, the defendant was not represented by counsel, and if the defendant has not yet been released on bail, the court shall hold a second bail hearing on the second court day following the initial bail hearing. An indigent defendant shall be afforded representation by appointed counsel at the state's expense at this second bail hearing. (K) Any person who fails to appear before any court as required is subject to the punishment provided by the law, and any bail given for the defendant's release may be forfeited. If there is a breach of a condition of release, the court may amend the bail. (L) Every surety, except a corporate surety licensed as provided by law, shall justify by affidavit, and may be required to describe in the affidavit, the property that the surety proposes as security and the encumbrances on it, the number and amount of other bonds and undertakings for bail entered into by the surety and remaining undischarged, and all of the surety's other liabilities. The surety shall provide other evidence of financial responsibility as the court or clerk may require. The court shall not approve a bail bond unless the surety or sureties appear, in the opinion of the court or clerk, to be financially responsible in at least the amount of the bond. A licensed attorney at law may not be a surety. Section 2. That existing sections 2929.12, 2929.15, 2929.22, 2929.25, and 2937.011 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 2929.12 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 234 and H.B. 531 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 2929.15 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 110, H.B. 281, and S.B. 288, all of the 134th General Assembly.